Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.180

Violation of rules—Penalty.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the violation of any of the rules or regulations of a park and recreation district adopted by its board for the preservation of order, control of traffic, protection of life or property, or for the regulation of the use of park property is a misdemeanor.

(2)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, violation of such a rule or regulation relating to traffic including parking, standing, stopping, and pedestrian offenses is a traffic infraction.

(b) Violation of such a rule or regulation equivalent to those provisions of Title 46 RCW set forth in RCW 46.63.020 remains a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 206; 1979 ex.s. c 136 s 37; 1963 c 4 s 36.69.180. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 19.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 136: See notes following RCW 46.63.010.